es: Tipo de acolchado en la palma: DK Impact; Relleno de doble capa; Espuma; Gel; Gel + espuma; Ninguno/mínimo; Almohadillas de silicona; SmartShock; Technogel; Otro
sv: Typ av handflate-dämpning: DK Impact; Vaddering i dubbla lager; Skum; Gel; Gel + skum; Ingen / minimal; Silikonkuddar; SmartShock; Technogel; Övrigt
fr: Type de rembourrage de la paume: DK Impact; Rembourrage double couche; Mousse; Gel; Gel et mousse; Aucun / minimal; Coussinets en silicone; SmartShock; Technogel; Autre
ko: 손바닥 패딩 유형: DK 임팩트; 이중 레이어 패딩; 폼; 겔; 겔 + 폼; 없음/최소; 실리콘 패드; SmartShock; 테크노젤; 기타
zh-TW: 手掌墊類型: DK Impact; 雙層襯墊; 泡棉; 凝膠; 凝膠 + 泡棉; 無 / 極少; 矽膠墊; SmartShock; Technogel; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de căptușire a palmei: DK Impact; Căptușeală cu strat dublu; Spumă; Gel; Gel și spumă; Fără / Minimal; Inserții din silicon; SmartShock; Technogel; Altele
nb: Foringstype for håndflate: DK Impact; Tolags polstring; Skum; Gelé; Gelé + skum; Ingen / minimal; Silikoninnlegg; SmartShock; Technogel; Annet
el: Τύπος επένδυσης παλάμης: DK Impact; Επένδυση διπλής στρώσης; Αφρός; Τζελ; Τζελ και αφρός; Καθόλου / Ελάχιστη; Μαξιλαράκια σιλικόνης; SmartShock; Technogel; Άλλο
it: Tipo di imbottitura del palmo: DK Impact; Imbottitura a doppio strato; Schiuma; Gel; Gel + schiuma; Nessuno / minimo; Cuscinetti in silicone; SmartShock; Technogel; Altro
pl: Typ wypełnienia dłoni: DK Impact; Dwuwarstwowa wyściółka; Pianka; Żel; Żel + pianka; Brak / Minimalne; Podkładki silikonowe; SmartShock; Technogel; Inne
fi: Kämmenen pehmusteen tyyppi: DK Impact; Kaksikerrospehmuste; Vaahtomuovi; Geeli; Geeli ja vaahtomuovi; Ei mitään / minimaalinen; Silikonipehmusteet; SmartShock; Technogel; Muu
nl: Type palmvulling: DK Impact; Dubbellaagse wattering; Schuim; Gel; Gel + schuim; Geen / minimaal; Siliconen pads; SmartShock; Technogel; Overig
pt-PT: Tipo de acolchoamento da palma da mão: DK Impact; Acolchoamento de camada dupla; Espuma; Gel; Gel + Espuma; Nenhum/mínimo; Almofadas de silicone; SmartShock; Technogel; Outro
da: Polstringstype i håndfladen: DK Impact; Dobbeltlagspolstring; Skum; Gel; Gel + skum; Ingen/minimal; Silikonepuder; SmartShock; Technogel; Andet
lt-LT: Delno paminkštinimo tipas: DK Impact; Dvisluoksnis paminkštinimas; Porolonas; Gelis; Gelis ir porolonas; Nėra / minimalus; Silikoninės pagalvėlės; SmartShock; Technogel; Kita
hu: Tenyér párnázás típusa: DK Impact; Kétrétegű párnázás; Hab; Gél; Gél + hab; Nincs / Minimális; Szilikon párnák; SmartShock; Technogel; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип подплънка на дланта: DK Impact; Двуслойна подплата; Пяна; Гел; Гел + пяна; Без / минимално; Силиконови подложки; SmartShock; Technogel; Друго
vi: Loại đệm lòng bàn tay: DK Impact; Đệm hai lớp; Mút xốp; Gel; Gel + Mút xốp; Không có / Tối thiểu; Đệm silicone; SmartShock; Technogel; Khác
cs: Typ polstrování dlaně: DK Impact; Dvouvrstvé polstrování; Pěna; Gel; Gel a pěna; Žádné/minimální; Silikonové vycpávky; SmartShock; Technogel; Jiné
ja: 手のひらパッドタイプ: DK Impact; 2層パッド; フォーム; ジェル; ジェル+フォーム; なし/最小限; シリコンパッド; SmartShock; Technogel; その他
sk-SK: Typ polstrovania dlane: DK Impact; Dvojvrstvová výstelka; Pena; Gél; Gél a pena; Žiadna/minimálna; Silikónové vložky; SmartShock; Technogel; Iné
en: Palm padding type: DK Impact; Dual layer padding; Foam; Gel; Gel + Foam; None / Minimal; Silicone pads; SmartShock; Technogel; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta blazinjenja dlani: DK Impact; Dvoslojno podložen; Pena; Gel; Gel + pena; Brez / minimalno; Silikonske blazinice; SmartShock; Technogel; Drugo
pt-BR: Palma, tipo de acolchoamento: DK Impact; Acolchoamento de camada dupla; Espuma; Gel; Gel + espuma; Nenhum / Mínimo; Pads de silicone; SmartShock; Technogel; Outro
tr: Avuç içi dolgu tipi: DK Impact; Çift katmanlı dolgu; Sünger; Jel; Jel + Sünger; Yok / Minimum; Silikon pedler; SmartShock; Technogel; Diğer
zh-CN: 手掌衬垫类型: DK Impact; 双层填充; 泡沫; 凝胶; 凝胶 + 泡沫; 无 / 极少; 硅胶垫; SmartShock; Technogel; 其他
ru: Тип защиты ладони: DK Impact; Двухслойная набивка; Пеноматериал; Гель; Гель + пеноматериал; Нет / минимальная; Силиконовые вставки; SmartShock; Technogel; Другое
th: ประเภทแผ่นรองฝ่ามือ: DK Impact; แผ่นรองสองชั้น; โฟม; เจล; เจล + โฟม; ไม่มี / บางมาก; แผ่นรองซิลิโคน; SmartShock; Technogel; อื่นๆ
de: Polsterungsart des Handschuhs: DK Impact; Zweilagige Polsterung; Schaumstoff; Gel; Gel + Schaumstoff; Keine / Minimal; Silikonpads; SmartShock; Technogel; Sonstige
hr-HR: Jastučenje dlana: DK Impact; Dvoslojna podstava; Pjena; Gel; Gel i pjena; Bez podstave / minimalna; Silikonski jastučići; SmartShock; Technogel; Ostalo